Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/eo_affix.dat
SFX T Y 130
SFX T   a     i           a
SFX T   a     is          a
SFX T   0     s           a
SFX T   a     os          a
SFX T   a     u           a
SFX T   a     us          a
SFX T   0     nta         a
SFX T   0     ntaj        a
SFX T   0     ntajn       a
SFX T   0     nte         a
SFX T   0     nto         a
SFX T   0     ntoj        a
SFX T   0     ntojn       a
SFX T   0     nton        a
SFX T   0     ta          a
SFX T   0     taj         a
SFX T   0     tajn        a
SFX T   0     tan         a
SFX T   0     te          a
SFX T   0     to          a
SFX T   0     toj         a
SFX T   0     tojn        a
SFX T   0     ton         a
SFX T   0     do          a
SFX T   0     don         a
SFX T   i     ado         i
SFX T   i     adoj        i
SFX T   i     adojn       i
SFX T   i     adon        i
SFX T   i     adi         i
SFX T   i     adis        i
SFX T   i     adas        i
SFX T   i     ados        i
SFX T   i     adu         i
SFX T   i     adus        i
SFX T   i     ada         i
SFX T   i     adaj        i
SFX T   i     adajn       i
SFX T   i     adan        i
SFX T   i     ade         i
SFX T   i     adi         i
SFX T   0     s           i
SFX T   i     as          i
SFX T   i     os          i
SFX T   i     u           i
SFX T   i     us          i
SFX T   0     nta         i
SFX T   0     ntaj        i
SFX T   0     ntajn       i
SFX T   0     ntan        i
SFX T   0     nte         i
SFX T   0     nt'         i
SFX T   0     nto         i
SFX T   0     ntoj        i
SFX T   0     ntojn       i
SFX T   0     nton        i
SFX T   i     anta        i
SFX T   i     antaj       i
SFX T   i     antajn      i
SFX T   i     antan       i
SFX T   i     ante        i
SFX T   i     ant'        i
SFX T   i     anto        i
SFX T   i     antoj       i
SFX T   i     antojn      i
SFX T   i     anton       i
SFX T   i     onta        i
SFX T   i     ontaj       i
SFX T   i     ontajn      i
SFX T   i     ontan       i
SFX T   i     onte        i
SFX T   i     onto        i
SFX T   i     ontoj       i
SFX T   i     ontojn      i
SFX T   i     onton       i
SFX T   i     o           i
SFX T   0     ta          i
SFX T   0     taj         i
SFX T   0     tajn        i
SFX T   0     tan         i
SFX T   0     te          i
SFX T   0     to          i
SFX T   0     toj         i
SFX T   0     tojn        i
SFX T   0     ton         i
SFX T   i     ata         i
SFX T   i     ataj        i
SFX T   i     atajn       i
SFX T   i     atan        i
SFX T   i     ate         i
SFX T   i     ato         i
SFX T   i     atoj        i
SFX T   i     atojn       i
SFX T   i     aton        i
SFX T   i     ota         i
SFX T   i     otaj        i
SFX T   i     otajn       i
SFX T   i     otan        i
SFX T   i     ote         i
SFX T   i     ot'         i
SFX T   i     oto         i
SFX T   i     otoj        i
SFX T   i     otojn       i
SFX T   i     oton        i
SFX T   i     ebla        i
SFX T   i     eblaj       i
SFX T   i     eblajn      i
SFX T   i     eblan       i
SFX T   i     eble        i
SFX T   i     eblo        i
SFX T   i     ebloj       i
SFX T   i     eblojn      i
SFX T   i     eblon       i
SFX T   i     eblis       i
SFX T   i     eblas       i
SFX T   i     eblos       i
SFX T   i     eblus       i
SFX T   i     enda        i
SFX T   i     endaj       i
SFX T   i     endajn      i
SFX T   i     endan       i
SFX T   i     ende        i
SFX T   i     endo        i
SFX T   i     endoj       i
SFX T   i     endojn      i
SFX T   i     endon       i
SFX T   i     endis       i
SFX T   i     endas       i
SFX T   i     endos       i
SFX T   i     endus       i

SFX U Y 55
SFX U   o     ula         o
SFX U   o     ulaj        o
SFX U   o     ulajn       o
SFX U   o     ulan        o
SFX U   o     ulina       o
SFX U   o     ulinaj      o
SFX U   o     ulinajn     o
SFX U   o     ulinan      o
SFX U   o     ule         o
SFX U   o     uline       o
SFX U   o     ulo         o
SFX U   o     uloj        o
SFX U   o     ulojn       o
SFX U   o     ulon        o
SFX U   o     ulino       o
SFX U   o     ulinoj      o
SFX U   o     ulinojn     o
SFX U   o     ulinon      o
SFX U   a     ula         a
SFX U   a     ulaj        a
SFX U   a     ulajn       a
SFX U   a     ulan        a
SFX U   a     ulina       a
SFX U   a     ulinaj      a
SFX U   a     ulinajn     a
SFX U   a     ulinan      a
SFX U   a     ule         a
SFX U   a     uline       a
SFX U   a     ul'         a
SFX U   a     ulo         a
SFX U   a     uloj        a
SFX U   a     ulojn       a
SFX U   a     ulon        a
SFX U   a     ulino       a
SFX U   a     ulinoj      a
SFX U   a     ulinojn     a
SFX U   a     ulinon      a
SFX U   i     ula         i
SFX U   i     ulaj        i
SFX U   i     ulajn       i
SFX U   i     ulan        i
SFX U   i     ulina       i
SFX U   i     ulinaj      i
SFX U   i     ulinajn     i
SFX U   i     ulinan      i
SFX U   i     ule         i
SFX U   i     uline       i
SFX U   i     ulo         i
SFX U   i     uloj        i
SFX U   i     ulojn       i
SFX U   i     ulon        i
SFX U   i     ulino       i
SFX U   i     ulinoj      i
SFX U   i     ulinojn     i
SFX U   i     ulinon      i

SFX V Y 79
SFX V   a     i           a
SFX V   a     is          a
SFX V   0     s           a
SFX V   a     os          a
SFX V   a     u           a
SFX V   a     us          a
SFX V   0     nta         a
SFX V   0     ntaj        i
SFX V   0     ntajn       i
SFX V   0     ntan        i
SFX V   0     nte         i
SFX V   i     ad'         i
SFX V   i     ado         i
SFX V   i     adoj        i
SFX V   i     adojn       i
SFX V   i     adon        i
SFX V   i     adi         i
SFX V   i     adis        i
SFX V   i     adas        i
SFX V   i     ados        i
SFX V   i     adu         i
SFX V   i     adus        i
SFX V   i     ada         i
SFX V   i     adaj        i
SFX V   i     adajn       i
SFX V   i     adan        i
SFX V   i     ade         i
SFX V   0     s           i
SFX V   i     as          i
SFX V   i     os          i
SFX V   i     u           i
SFX V   i     us          i
SFX V   0     nta         i
SFX V   0     ntaj        i
SFX V   0     ntajn       i
SFX V   0     ntan        i
SFX V   0     nte         i
SFX V   0     nt'         i
SFX V   0     nto         i
SFX V   0     ntoj        i
SFX V   0     ntojn       i
SFX V   0     nton        i
SFX V   i     anta        i
SFX V   i     antaj       i
SFX V   i     antajn      i
SFX V   i     antan       i
SFX V   i     ante        i
SFX V   i     ant'        i
SFX V   i     anto        i
SFX V   i     antoj       i
SFX V   i     antojn      i
SFX V   i     anton       i
SFX V   i     onta        i
SFX V   i     ontaj       i
SFX V   i     ontajn      i
SFX V   i     ontan       i
SFX V   i     onte        i
SFX V   i     ont'        i
SFX V   i     onto        i
SFX V   i     ontoj       i
SFX V   i     ontojn      i
SFX V   i     onton       i
SFX V   i     o           i
SFX V   0     nda         i
SFX V   0     ndaj        i
SFX V   0     ndajn       i
SFX V   0     ndan        i
SFX V   0     ndo         i
SFX V   0     ndon        i
SFX V   0     ndaĵo       i
SFX V   0     ndaĵoj      i
SFX V   0     ndaĵojn     i
SFX V   0     ndaĵon      i
SFX V   i     ema         i
SFX V   i     emaj        i
SFX V   i     emajn       i
SFX V   i     eman        i
SFX V   i     emo         i
SFX V   i     emon        i

SFX W Y 55
SFX W   o     ana         o
SFX W   o     anaj        o
SFX W   o     anajn       o
SFX W   o     anan        o
SFX W   o     anina       o
SFX W   o     aninaj      o
SFX W   o     aninajn     o
SFX W   o     aninan      o
SFX W   o     ane         o
SFX W   o     anine       o
SFX W   o     an'         o
SFX W   o     ano         o
SFX W   o     anoj        o
SFX W   o     anojn       o
SFX W   o     anon        o
SFX W   o     anino       o
SFX W   o     aninoj      o
SFX W   o     aninojn     o
SFX W   o     aninon      o
SFX W   0     na          a
SFX W   0     naj         a
SFX W   0     najn        a
SFX W   0     nan         a
SFX W   0     nina        a
SFX W   0     ninaj       a
SFX W   0     ninajn      a
SFX W   0     ninan       a
SFX W   0     ne          a
SFX W   0     nine        a
SFX W   0     no          a
SFX W   0     noj         a
SFX W   0     nojn        a
SFX W   0     non         a
SFX W   0     nino        a
SFX W   0     ninoj       a
SFX W   0     ninojn      a
SFX W   0     ninon       a
SFX W   i     ana         i
SFX W   i     anaj        i
SFX W   i     anajn       i
SFX W   i     anan        i
SFX W   i     anina       i
SFX W   i     aninaj      i
SFX W   i     aninajn     i
SFX W   i     aninan      i
SFX W   i     ane         i
SFX W   i     anine       i
SFX W   i     ano         i
SFX W   i     anoj        i
SFX W   i     anojn       i
SFX W   i     anon        i
SFX W   i     anino       i
SFX W   i     aninoj      i
SFX W   i     aninojn     i
SFX W   i     aninon      i

SFX X Y 60
SFX X   a     0           a
SFX X   e     0           e
SFX X   o     0           o
SFX X   i     0           [^g]i
SFX X   gi    ĝis         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝas         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝos         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝu          igi
SFX X   gi    ĝus         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝadis       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝadas       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝados       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝadu        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝadus       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝinta       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝintaj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝintajn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝintan      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝinte       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝinto       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝintoj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝintojn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝinton      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝanta       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝantaj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝantajn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝantan      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝante       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝanto       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝantoj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝantojn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝanton      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝonta       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝontaj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝontajn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝontan      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝonte       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝonto       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝontoj      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝontojn     igi
SFX X   gi    ĝonton      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝo          igi
SFX X   gi    ĝoj         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝojn        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝon         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝi          igi
SFX X   gi    ĝa          igi
SFX X   gi    ĝaj         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝajn        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝan         igi
SFX X   gi    ĝe          igi
SFX X   gi    ĝema        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemaj       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemajn      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝeman       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝeme        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemo        igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemoj       igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemojn      igi
SFX X   gi    ĝemon       igi

SFX Y Y 27
SFX Y   0     ĵa          a
SFX Y   0     ĵaj         a
SFX Y   0     ĵajn        a
SFX Y   0     ĵan         a
SFX Y   0     ĵ'          a
SFX Y   0     ĵo          a
SFX Y   0     ĵoj         a
SFX Y   0     ĵojn        a
SFX Y   0     ĵon         a
SFX Y   i     aĵa         i
SFX Y   i     aĵaj        i
SFX Y   i     aĵajn       i
SFX Y   i     aĵan        i
SFX Y   i     aĵ'         i
SFX Y   i     aĵo         i
SFX Y   i     aĵoj        i
SFX Y   i     aĵojn       i
SFX Y   i     aĵon        i
SFX Y   o     aĵa         o
SFX Y   o     aĵaj        o
SFX Y   o     aĵajn       o
SFX Y   o     aĵan        o
SFX Y   o     aĵ'         o
SFX Y   o     aĵo         o
SFX Y   o     aĵoj        o
SFX Y   o     aĵojn       o
SFX Y   o     aĵon        o
